Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 8. Organic Change.

Sec. 10.06.530.
Merger.

Two or more domestic corporations may merge into one of such corporations under a plan of merger approved in the manner provided in AS

10.06.530

—

10.06.582

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Collateral references. —

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations, § 2148 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations, § 885 et seq.

Valuation of stock of dissenting stockholders in case of consolidation or merger of corporation, sale of its assets, or the like. 48 ALR3d 430.

“Golden parachute” defense to hostile corporate takeover. 66 ALR4th 138.

Lock-up option defense to hostile corporate takeover. 66 ALR4th 180.

Sec. 10.06.532.
Procedure for merger.

A plan of merger approved by a resolution of the board of each corporation shall be proposed setting out

the names of the corporations proposing to merge and the name of the surviving corporation into which they propose to merge;

the terms and conditions of the proposed merger;

the manner and basis of converting the shares of each merging corporation into shares or other securities or obligations of the surviving corporation;

a statement of changes in the articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation caused by the merger; and

other provisions of the merger considered necessary or desirable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.534.
Consolidation.

Two or more domestic corporations may consolidate into a new domestic corporation under a plan of consolidation approved in the manner provided in AS

10.06.530

—

10.06.582

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.536.
Procedure for consolidation.

A plan of consolidation approved by a resolution of the board of each corporation shall be proposed setting out

the names of the corporations proposing to consolidate and the name of the new corporation into which they propose to consolidate;

the terms and conditions of the proposed consolidation;

the manner and basis of converting the shares of each corporation into shares or other securities or obligations of the new corporation;

the statements with respect to the new corporation required to be set out in the articles of incorporation for corporations organized under this chapter; and

other provisions of the consolidation considered necessary or desirable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Collateral references. —

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations, § 2227 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations, § 885 et seq.

Sec. 10.06.538.
Share exchange.

All of the issued or outstanding shares of one or more classes of a domestic corporation may be acquired through the exchange of all of the issued or outstanding shares of the class or classes by another domestic or foreign corporation under a plan of exchange approved in the manner provided in AS

10.06.530

—

10.06.582

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.540.
Procedure for share exchange.

A plan of exchange approved by a resolution of the board of each corporation shall be proposed setting out

the name of the corporation the shares of which are proposed to be acquired by exchange and the name of the acquiring corporation;

the terms and conditions of the proposed exchange;

the manner and basis of exchanging the shares to be acquired for shares, obligations, or other securities of the acquiring corporation or another corporation, or, in whole or in part, for cash or other property;

other provisions of the proposed exchange considered necessary or desirable.

The procedure authorized by this section does not limit the power of a corporation to acquire all or part of the shares of any class or classes of a corporation through voluntary exchange or otherwise by agreement with the shareholders.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.542.
Disparate treatment of shares of the same class or series prohibited; exceptions.

Except as provided in (b) of this section all shares of the same class or series shall be treated equally with respect to a distribution of shares, cash, property, rights, or securities in any plan of merger, consolidation, or share exchange.

Disparate treatment of shares of the same class or series may be proposed in a plan of merger, consolidation, or share exchange if

disparate treatment is necessary to preserve a subchapter S election under the Internal Revenue Code of 1954;

there is a sound business reason for disparate treatment and proponents of the plan prove it is consistent with fiduciary duties owed to all shareholders; or

there is unanimous consent of all shareholders.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.544.
Notice to and approval by shareholders.

Upon approval by the board of each corporation of a plan of merger, consolidation, or exchange, each board shall, by resolution, direct that the plan be submitted for approval, at either an annual or special meeting, by the outstanding shares of each corporation. Written notice shall be given to each shareholder of record, whether or not the share or shares of the shareholder have voting rights under the articles of the corporation, not less than 20 days before the meeting, in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of shareholders. Whether the meeting is an annual or special meeting, the notice shall state that the purpose or one of the purposes of the meeting is to consider the proposed plan of merger, consolidation, or exchange. A copy or summary of the plan of merger, consolidation, or exchange, as well as a copy of AS

10.06.574

and

10.06.576

, concerning the rights of a dissenting shareholder, shall be included with the notice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.546.
Manner of approval by shareholders.

At each meeting for which notice is given under AS

10.06.544

a vote of the shareholders shall be taken on the proposed plan of merger, consolidation, or exchange. Each outstanding share of each corporation may vote on the proposed plan whether or not the share has voting rights under the articles of the corporation. The plan is approved if it receives the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares of each corporation. If a class of shares of a corporation is entitled to vote on the plan as a class, the plan is approved if it receives the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares of each class of shares entitled to vote on the plan as a class and the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the total shares entitled to vote on the plan. A class of shares of a corporation is entitled to vote as a class if a plan contains a provision that, if contained in a proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation, would entitle the class of shares to vote as a class and, in the case of an exchange, if the class is included in the exchange.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.548.
Abandonment of plan of merger, consolidation, or exchange.

After approval of the outstanding shares of each corporation under AS

10.06.546

and before the filing of the articles of merger, consolidation, or exchange, the merger, consolidation, or exchange may be abandoned under provisions set out in the plan.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.550.
Execution and contents of articles of merger, consolidation, or exchange.

After approval, articles of merger, articles of consolidation, or articles of exchange shall be executed by each corporation by its president or a vice-president and by its secretary or an assistant secretary, and must set out the

plan of merger, consolidation, or exchange;

number of shares outstanding of each corporation and, if the shares of a class were entitled to vote as a class, the designation and number of outstanding shares of the class; and

number of shares voted for and against the plan and, if the shares of a class were entitled to vote as a class, the number of shares of the class voted for and against the plan.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 11 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.06.552.
Filing of articles of merger, consolidation, or exchange.

An original and an exact copy of the articles of merger, consolidation, or exchange shall be delivered to the commissioner for processing according to AS

10.06.910

and for the issuance of a certificate of merger, consolidation, or exchange.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.554.
Merger of subsidiary corporation.

A corporation owning at least 90 percent of the outstanding shares of each class of another corporation may merge the other corporation into itself without approval by a vote of the shareholders of either corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.556.
Procedure for merger of subsidiary corporation.

The board of a proposed surviving corporation shall, by resolution, approve a plan of merger setting out

the name of the subsidiary corporation and the name of the corporation owning at least 90 percent of its shares;

subject to AS

10.06.542

, the manner and basis of converting the shares of the subsidiary corporation into shares, obligations, or other securities of the surviving or other corporation or, in whole or in part, into cash or other property.

A copy of a plan of merger shall be mailed to each shareholder of record of the subsidiary corporation.

Articles of merger shall be executed by the surviving corporation by its president or a vice-president and by its secretary or an assistant secretary and must set out the

plan of merger;

number of outstanding shares of each class of the subsidiary corporation and the number of those shares of each class owned by the surviving corporation; and

date of the mailing to shareholders of the subsidiary corporation of the plan of merger.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 12 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.06.558.
Filing of articles of merger of subsidiary corporation.

An original and an exact copy of the articles of merger of a subsidiary corporation shall be delivered to the commissioner for processing according to AS

10.06.910

and for the issuance of a certificate of merger.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.560.
Effective date and effect of merger, consolidation, or exchange.

A merger, consolidation, or exchange is effective upon the issuance of a certificate of merger, consolidation, or exchange by the commissioner, or on a later date, not more than 30 days after the filing of the certificate with the commissioner, as provided in the plan.

When a merger or consolidation becomes effective,

the corporations that are parties to the plan of merger or consolidation shall be a single corporation that, in the case of a merger, shall be that corporation designated in the plan of merger as the surviving corporation, and, in the case of a consolidation, shall be the new corporation provided for in the plan of consolidation;

the separate existence of all corporations that are parties to the plan of merger or consolidation, except the surviving or new corporation, ceases;

a surviving or new corporation has all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers and is subject to all the duties and liabilities of a corporation organized under this chapter;

the surviving or new corporation possesses all the public and private rights, privileges, immunities, and franchises of each of the merging or consolidating corporations; all property, real, personal, and mixed, and all debts due on whatever account, including subscriptions to shares, and all other choses in action, and every other interest of, belonging to, or due to each of the merged or consolidated corporations, shall be transferred to and vested in the surviving or new corporation without further act; and the title to real estate, or an interest in real estate, vested in any of the corporations may not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of a merger or consolidation;

a surviving or new corporation is responsible and liable for all the liabilities and obligations of each of the merged or consolidated corporations; a claim existing or action or proceeding pending by or against the merged or consolidated corporations may be prosecuted as if the merger or consolidation has not taken place, or the surviving or new corporation may be substituted in its place; and the rights of creditors or any liens upon the property of the merged or consolidated corporations may not be impaired by the merger or consolidation;

in the case of a merger, the articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation are considered to be amended to the extent that changes in its articles are stated in the plan of merger; and, in the case of a consolidation, the statements set out in the articles of consolidation that are required or permitted to be set out in the articles of incorporation of corporations organized under this chapter are considered to be the original articles of the new corporation.

When a merger, consolidation, or exchange becomes effective, the shares of the corporation or corporations party to the plan that are to be converted or exchanged under the terms of the plan cease to exist, in the case of a merger or consolidation, or are considered to be exchanged, in the case of an exchange, and the holders of the shares are entitled only to the shares, obligations, other securities, cash, or other property into which the shares have been converted or for which they have been exchanged, in accordance with the plan, subject to the rights under AS

10.06.574

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.562.
Merger, consolidation, or exchange of shares between domestic and foreign corporation.

One or more foreign corporations and one or more domestic corporations may be merged or consolidated, or participate in an exchange, if the merger, consolidation, or exchange is permitted by the laws of the state under which each foreign corporation is organized and

each domestic corporation complies with the provisions of this chapter with respect to the merger, consolidation, or exchange of domestic corporations and each foreign corporation complies with the applicable provisions of the laws of the state under which it is organized; and

if the surviving or new corporation is to be governed by the laws of another state, it complies with the provisions of this chapter concerning foreign corporations if it is to transact business in this state and it files with the commissioner an

agreement that the surviving or new foreign corporation may be served with process in this state in a proceeding for the enforcement of an obligation of a domestic corporation that is a party to the merger or consolidation and in a proceeding for the enforcement of the rights of a dissenting shareholder of a domestic corporation against the surviving or new corporation;

irrevocable appointment of the commissioner as the agent of the surviving or new corporation to accept service of process in a proceeding described in (A) of this paragraph; and

agreement that it will promptly pay to the dissenting shareholders of a domestic corporation the amount to which they are entitled under provisions of this chapter with respect to the rights of dissenting shareholders.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.564.
Disclosure of alien affiliates.

Not less than 20 days before the consummation of an organic change under AS

10.06.530

—

10.06.562

, the surviving or new corporation shall deliver to the commissioner

a list of the names and addresses of each alien affiliate of the surviving or new corporation;

the percentage of outstanding shares controlled by each alien affiliate; and

a specific description of the nature of the relationship between the surviving or new corporation and its alien affiliate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.566.
Disposition of assets in regular course of business; mortgage or pledge of assets.

The board of the corporation, without the approval of the shareholders or outstanding shares of the corporation, may authorize the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the property and assets of a corporation in the usual and regular course of its business and the mortgage or pledge of any or all property and assets of a corporation whether or not in the usual and regular course of business, upon terms and conditions and for consideration, that may consist in whole or in part of cash or other property, including shares, obligations, or other securities of another domestic or foreign corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Collateral references. —

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations, § 2267 et seq.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations, §§ 142-149.

19 C.J.S., Corporations, § 715.

Applicability of statutes regulating sales of assets or property of corporation as affected by purpose or character of corporation.
9 ALR2d 1306.

Sec. 10.06.568.
Disposition of assets not in regular course of business.

A sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property and assets, with or without the good will, of a corporation, if not in the usual and regular course of its business, may be made upon terms and conditions and for consideration, that may consist in whole or in part of cash or other property, including shares, obligations or other securities of another foreign or domestic corporation, as authorized in (b) of this section.

A sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition shall be recommended to the shareholders by resolution approved by the board and submitted to a vote of the shareholders at a regular or special meeting. Written notice shall be given to each shareholder of record of the corporation, whether or not the shares have voting rights under the articles of the corporation, not less than 20 days before the meeting, in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of shareholders. Whether the meeting is an annual or special meeting the notice shall state that the purpose or one of the purposes of the meeting is to consider the proposed sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition, and include a copy of AS

10.06.574

—

10.06.576

, concerning the rights of a dissenting shareholder.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.570.
Approval of transaction by shareholders.

At a meeting for which notice is given under AS

10.06.568(b)

a vote of the shareholders shall be taken on the recommended sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition and the shareholders may fix, or may authorize the board to fix, the terms and conditions and the consideration to be received by the corporation. The transaction is approved if the recommendation of the board receives the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares of the corporation, unless a class of shares is entitled to vote as a class, in which event the transaction shall be approved upon receiving the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares of each class of shares entitled to vote as a class and of the total shares entitled to vote.

If the buyer in a sale of assets under AS

10.06.568

is in control of or under common control with the seller, the principal terms of the sale must be approved by at least 90 percent of the outstanding shares of the seller unless the sale is to a domestic or foreign corporation in consideration for the nonredeemable common shares of the purchasing corporation or its parent.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.572.
Abandonment of transaction by board.

The board in its discretion may abandon a sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of assets after approval by the shares without further action or approval by the shares, subject to the rights of third parties under contracts relating to the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.574.
Right of shareholders to dissent.

A shareholder may dissent from the following corporate actions:

a plan of merger, consolidation, or exchange to which the corporation is a party; or

a sale or exchange of all or substantially all of the property and assets of the corporation not made in the usual and regular course of its business, including a sale in dissolution, but not including a sale under a court order or a sale for cash on terms requiring that all or substantially all of the net proceeds of the sale be distributed to the shareholders in accordance with their respective interests within one year after the date of sale.

The rights of a shareholder who dissents as to less than all of the shares registered in the name of the shareholder shall be determined as if the shares as to which the shareholder dissents and the other shares of the shareholder are registered in the names of different shareholders.

This section does not apply to the shareholders of the surviving corporation in a merger if a vote of shareholders of the surviving corporation is not necessary to authorize the merger.

This section does not apply to the holders of shares of a class or series if the shares of the class or series were registered on a national securities exchange on the date fixed to determine the shareholders entitled to vote at the meeting of shareholders at which the plan of merger, consolidation, or exchange or the proposed sale or exchange of property and assets is to be acted upon unless the articles of the corporation provide otherwise.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.576.
Procedures relating to the exercise of a shareholder’s right to dissent; completion of corporate action; notice of election; treatment of shares.

A shareholder electing to exercise a right to dissent shall file with the corporation, before or at the meeting of shareholders at which the proposed corporate action is submitted to a vote, a written objection to the proposed corporate action. The objection must include a notice of election to dissent, the shareholder’s name and residence address, the number and classes of shares as to which the shareholder dissents, and a demand for payment of the fair value of the shares if the action is taken. A shareholder to whom the corporation did not give notice of the meeting in accordance with this chapter is not required to make the objection provided in this section.

Within 10 days after the shareholders’ vote authorizing the action, the corporation shall given written notice of the authorization to each shareholder who filed written objection or from whom written objection was not required. The corporation may consider that a shareholder who voted for the proposed action has elected not to enforce a right of dissent under this chapter, and need not give notice to the shareholder.

Within 20 days after notice has been given under (b) of this section, a shareholder from whom written objection was not required under (a) of this section and who elects to dissent shall file with the corporation a written notice of the election, stating the shareholder’s name and residence address, the number and classes of shares as to which the shareholder dissents, and a demand for payment of the fair value of the shares. A shareholder who elects to dissent from a merger under AS

10.06.532

, a consolidation under AS

10.06.534

, a share exchange under AS

10.06.540

, a transaction authorized under AS

10.06.562

, or a sale of assets under AS

10.06.568

shall file a written notice of the election to dissent within 20 days after the merger plan, consolidation plan, share exchange plan, or sale of assets resolution has been mailed to the shareholder.

A merger, consolidation, or exchange is considered completed within the meaning of this chapter on the effective date determined in accordance with AS

10.06.560

; a transaction under AS

10.06.568

is completed within the meaning of this chapter when the corporation has received the consideration specified in the board resolution that was submitted to the shareholders in accordance with that section.

Upon completion of the corporation action, the shareholder shall cease to have the rights of a shareholder except the right to be paid the fair value of the shares as to which the dissenter’s rights were perfected under this chapter. A notice of election may be withdrawn by the shareholder at any time before an acceptance under AS

10.06.578(f)

, but in no case later than 60 days from the date of completion of the corporate action, except that the time for withdrawing a notice of election shall be extended for 60 days from the date an offer is made, if the corporation fails to make a timely offer under AS

10.06.578

. After the time for withdrawal has expired, withdrawal of a notice of election requires the written consent of the corporation. In order to be effective, withdrawal of a notice of election must be accompanied by the return to the corporation of an advance payment made to the shareholder as provided in AS

10.06.578

. If a notice of election is withdrawn, if the corporate action is rescinded, if a court determines that the shareholder is not entitled to the right to dissent, or if the shareholder otherwise loses the right to dissent, the shareholder shall not have the right to receive payment for the shares and shall be reinstated to all rights as a shareholder that were effective on the date of the completion of the corporate action. The rights to which the shareholder is reinstated include intervening preemptive rights and the right to payment of an intervening dividend or other distribution. If an intervening right has expired or if a dividend or distribution that is not in cash has been completed, the corporation may elect to pay the shareholder the fair value of the shares in cash at the value, as determined by the board, at the time of the expiration or completion. The election to pay the value in cash shall be without prejudice to a corporate proceeding that has occurred in the interim.

At the time of filing the notice of election to dissent, or within 30 days after the shareholder has filed the notice, the shareholder shall submit to the corporation, or to its transfer agent, the certificates representing the shares for which payment is claimed, if certificates have been issued. The corporation or its transfer agent shall note conspicuously on the certificates, or on a separate document if certificates have not been issued for the shares, that a notice of election has been filed, and shall return the certificates or the separate document to the shareholder or to the person who submitted them on the shareholder’s behalf. Unless a court, for good cause shown, otherwise directs, a shareholder who fails to comply with this subsection loses the right to dissent granted by this chapter, if the corporation gives written notice that the right to dissent will be lost to the shareholder within 45 days from the date that the shareholder filed the notice of election to dissent. If the corporation fails to exercise this notice option in a timely manner, the shareholder retains the right to dissent granted by this chapter.

When a share of a dissenting shareholder under (f) of this section is transferred, the new certificate must bear a notation similar to that made under (f) of this section and state the name of the original dissenting holder of the shares, or, if the share is an uncertificated share, the corporation must give the transferee a written notice stating that a notice of election to dissent has been filed and giving the name of the original dissenting holder. A transferee acquires only the rights in the corporation that the original dissenting shareholder had at the time of transfer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am §§ 43, 44 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

The term “uncertificated” was substituted for “certificateless” in (g) of this section in 1989 to conform to national usage.

Sec. 10.06.578.
Offer and payment to dissenting shareholders; circumstances where prohibited.

Within 15 days after the expiration of the period within which shareholders may file their notice of election to dissent under AS

10.06.576

, or within 15 days after the proposed corporate action is completed, whichever is later, the corporation or, in the case of a merger or consolidation, the surviving or new corporation, shall make a written offer by certified mail to each shareholder who has filed the notice of election, to pay the amount the corporation estimates to be the fair value of the shares. The offer shall be made at the same price for each share to all dissenting shareholders of the same class, or if divided into series, of the same series.

The offer required by (a) of this section must be accompanied by a

balance sheet of the corporation whose shares the dissenting shareholder holds; the date of the balance sheet shall be that of the most recent balance sheet produced in the 12 months before the offer;

profit and loss statement or statements for at least 12 months preceding the date of the balance sheet; if the corporation was not in existence during the entire 12-month period preceding the balance sheet required by (1) of this subsection, then a profit and loss statement for that portion of the 12-month period preceding the balance sheet during which the corporation was in existence;

statement of the total number of shares with respect to which notices of election to dissent have been received and the total number of holders of these shares; and

copy of this section and AS

10.06.580

.

If the corporate action has been completed the offer required by (a) of this section must also be accompanied by

advance payment to each shareholder who submitted the share certificates to the corporation, or to whom notice was sent if the shares were uncertificated, as provided in AS

10.06.576(f)

, of the amount offered under (a) of this section; or

a statement to a shareholder who has not submitted the share certificates, if certificates were issued for the shares, that advance payment of the amount offered under (a) of this section will be made by the corporation promptly upon submission of the certificates.

If the corporate action has not been completed when the offer required by (a) of this section is made, the advance payment or statement about the advance payment shall be sent to each shareholder entitled to the payment or notice, after completion of the corporate action.

The advance payment or statement about the advance payment shall include advice to the shareholder that acceptance of the payment does not constitute a waiver of the shareholder’s right to dissent.

The corporation may consider that a shareholder who fails to make written objection to the amount tendered under (c)(1) of this section or to submit shares in response to the statement sent under (c)(2) of this section within 30 days of the date the statement was mailed has agreed that the amount offered represents the fair value of the shares. The shareholder shall have no interest in the shares or the outcome of litigation begun under AS

10.06.580

.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, if the payments otherwise required by (c) and (d) of this section or determined in accordance with AS

10.06.580

would be distributions in violation of AS

10.06.358

—

10.06.365

, or

10.06.375

, the corporation may not make a distribution to a dissenting shareholder. In that event, a corporation that would otherwise have the payment obligation under (c) and (d) of this section or AS

10.06.580

shall, in addition to complying with (a) and (b) of this section, give written notice within the time limits of (a) and (b) of this section to dissenting shareholders of its inability to make payment. The notice must include

an explanation why the corporation is unable to make the payments otherwise required by this section;

a statement that a dissenting shareholder has an option to

withdraw the shareholder’s notice of election to dissent, and that the corporation will consider that the withdrawal was made with the written consent of the corporation; or

retain the status of a dissenter, and, if the corporation is liquidated, be subordinated to the rights of the creditors of the corporation, but have rights superior to the nondissenting shareholders, but if the corporation is not liquidated, retain the right to be paid under (c) and (d) of this section or AS 10.06.580 and the corporation must satisfy the obligation when the restrictions on distributions do not apply; and

a statement that if the corporation does not receive the written election provided under (2) of this subsection within 60 days after notice given as required by this section, the corporation will consider that the shareholder has withdrawn the notice of election under (2)(A) of this subsection.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 45 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

The term “uncertificated” was substituted for “certificateless” in (c)(1) of this section in 1989 to conform to national usage. In 2002, in (b)(2) of this section, “subsection” was substituted for “section” to correct a manifest error.

Sec. 10.06.580.
Action to determine value of shares.

If the corporation fails to make the offer required by AS

10.06.578(a)

or the shareholder rejects the offer within the 30-day period specified in AS

10.06.578(f)

,

the corporation shall, within 20 days after the expiration of the 30-day period specified in AS

10.06.578(f)

, file a petition in the court of the judicial district where the registered office of the corporation is located, requesting that the fair value of the shares be determined; if, in the case of a merger or consolidation, the surviving or new corporation is a foreign corporation without a registered office in the state, the petition shall be filed in the judicial district where the registered office of the domestic corporation was last located; or

if the corporation fails to institute a proceeding as provided in this section, a dissenting shareholder may institute a proceeding in the name of the corporation; if a dissenting shareholder does not institute a proceeding within 30 days after the expiration of the 20-day period granted the corporation under (1) of this subsection, the dissenter loses the dissenter’s rights unless the superior court, for good cause shown, otherwise directs.

All dissenting shareholders who have rejected the corporate offer extended under AS

10.06.578(a)

, wherever residing, shall be made parties to the proceeding as an action against their shares quasi in rem. The corporation shall serve a copy of the complaint in the proceeding on each dissenting shareholder who is a resident of this state in the manner provided by the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, and on each nonresident dissenting shareholder either by certified mail and publication, or in another manner permitted by law. The jurisdiction of the court shall be plenary and exclusive. A dissenting shareholder who is a party to the proceeding is entitled to judgment against the corporation for the amount determined under (c) of this section to be the fair value of the shares of that shareholder.

The court shall determine whether a dissenting shareholder who is a party to the court action is entitled to receive payment for the shareholder’s shares. If the corporation does not request a determination, or if the court finds that a dissenting shareholder is entitled to a determination, the court shall establish the value of the shares; for the purposes of this section, the value shall be the fair value at the close of business on the day before the date on which the vote was taken approving the proposed corporate action. In fixing the fair value of the shares, the court shall consider the nature of the transaction giving rise to the right to dissent under AS

10.06.576

, its effects on the corporation and its shareholders, the concepts and methods customary in the relevant securities and financial markets for determining the fair value of shares of a corporation engaging in a similar transaction under comparable circumstances, and other relevant factors. The court may appoint one or more persons as appraisers to receive evidence and recommend a decision on the question of fair value of the shares. The appraisers have the power and authority specified in the order of appointment or as amended.

The judgment must include an allowance for interest at the rate the court finds to be fair and equitable, from the date on which the proposed corporate action vote was taken to the date of payment. In determining the rate of interest, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including the rate of interest that the corporation would have had to pay to borrow money during the pendency of the proceeding. If the court finds that the refusal of a shareholder to accept the corporate offer of payment for the shares is arbitrary, vexatious, or otherwise in bad faith, the court shall deny interest to the shareholder.

A party to the proceeding shall bear its own costs and expenses, including the fees and expenses of its counsel and of any experts employed by it. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the court may, in its discretion, apportion and assess all or part of the costs, expenses, and fees incurred by the corporation against one or more of the dissenting shareholders who are parties to the proceeding, if the court finds that a refusal to accept the corporate offer was arbitrary, vexatious, or otherwise in bad faith. The court may, in its discretion, apportion and assess all or a part of the costs, expenses, and fees incurred by one or more of the dissenting shareholders who are parties to the proceeding against the corporation if the court finds that

the fair value of the shares materially exceeds the amount that the corporation offered to pay;

an offer or required advance payment was not made by the corporation as provided in AS

10.06.578

;

the corporation failed to institute the special proceeding within the period specified under (a) of this section; or

the action of the corporation in complying with its obligations as provided in this chapter was arbitrary, vexatious, or otherwise in bad faith.

Unless prohibited by AS

10.06.578(g)

, within 60 days after the final determination of the proceeding, the corporation shall pay to each dissenting shareholder who is a party the amount determined under (e) of this section in exchange for the surrender of the certificate representing the dissenter’s shares or the dissenter’s shares if the shares are uncertificated. Upon payment of the judgment, the dissenting shareholder ceases to have an interest in the shares.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 46 ch 82 SLA 1989; am § 14 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

The term “uncertificated” was substituted for “certificateless” in (f) of this section in 1989 to conform to national usage.

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of (b) of this section on Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure 4 and 19, see secs. 20 and 21, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for effect of the enactment of (e) of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 82, see sec. 22, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.06.582.
Status of shares acquired from dissenting shareholders.

Shares acquired by a corporation under AS

10.06.578

and

10.06.580

shall be held and disposed of by the corporation as other shares reacquired under AS

10.06.388

, except that, in the case of a merger or consolidation, they shall be held and disposed of as the plan of merger or consolidation may otherwise provide.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.590.
Conversion to limited liability company. [Repealed, § 29 ch 60 SLA 2013.]